src/share/files/dictionaries/hyph_de_AT.dic
UTF-8
#
# Hyphenation dictionary for de_AT.
#
# Generated by tools/updateHyphenationFilesFromTexHyphen.sh - do not edit.
# See README_hyph_de_AT.txt for the full licences and SOURCES.md for the
# state of every locale in this directory.
#
# The file is single level on purpose: Dictionary::parseFile() does not know
# the NEXTLEVEL directive, so all patterns share one pattern space.
#
# Hyphenation patterns
#   source:  hyphenation/tex-hyphen, hyph-utf8/tex/generic/hyph-utf8/patterns/txt/hyph-de-1996.pat.txt
#   code:    de-1996
#   version: 2024-02-28
#   commit:  5684c0f51c0b81133db2efbe60a408b4155a3ff5 (2026-02-24)
#   licence: MIT, https://opensource.org/licenses/mit-license.php
#
# Compound word list (in front of the patterns; where both define the same
# text, parse_ini_file() keeps the last one, so the patterns win)
#   source:  LibreOffice/dictionaries, de/hyph_de_DE.dic
#   commit:  32b006a2c22a4ac7e8ed3f03346f7b3d85a970a4 (2026-08-22)
#   licence: LGPL 2 or later (adaption), LPPL (underlying TeX tables)
#
da1her
da1her1ab1
da1her1an1
da1her1auf1
da1her1aus1
da1her1ein1
da1her1nieder1
da1her1über1
da1her1um1
da1her1unter1
da1hin1
da1hin1ab1
da1hin1an1
da1hin1auf1
da1hin1aus1
da1hin1ein1
da1hinten1
da1hinter1
da1hin1über1
da1hin1unter1
da1zu1
her
her1ab1
her1an1
her1auf1
her1aus1
her1ein1
her1nieder1
her1über1
her1um1
her1unter1
hin
hin1ab1
hin1an1
hin1auf1
hin1aus1
hin1ein1
hinten1
hinter
hin1über1
hin1unter1
hin1weg1
hin1zu1
hint1an1
mit
raus
vor1ab
vor1an1
vor1weg1
weg
aar1gau
aar1gaus
ab1ächze
ab1ärgere
ab1bau1front
ab1bau1kon1zession
ab1bau1kon1zessions1
ab1bau1ort
ab1bau1region
ab1bau1situation
ab1bildungs1funktion
ab1bildungs1geo1metrie
ab1bleiben
ab1brand1an1flug
ab1breviatur1sprache
ab1bruch
ab1brüche
ab1bruch1makro
ab1bruch1signal
ab1bruch1stück
ab1bruch1taste
ab1darbe
ab1deck1creme
ab1deck1crème
ab1deck1material
ab1deckung
ab1deckungs1
ab1dreh1eisen
ab1ebben
abend1abitur
abend1appell
abend1audienz
abend1essen
abend1publikum
abend1robe
abend1röte
abend1ruhe
abend1show
abend1stern
abend1uni1versität
abend1uni1versitäts1
abenteuer1ur1laub
abenteuer1ur1lauber
ab
aber
aberdeen
aber1dee1ner
aber1dee1ne1rin
aber1dee1ne1rin1nen
aber1dee1ners
aberdeens
aber1millionen
ab1ernte
ab1ernten
ab1erration
ab1errations1
ab1erziehe
ab1erziehung
ab1erziehst
ab1erzog
ab1erzöge
abes1si1ni1en
abes1si1ni1er
abes1si1ni1e1rin
abes1si1nisch
ab1fahrt
ab1fahrts1
ab1fahrt1s2ignal
ab1fahrts1signal
ab1fall1auf1bereitung
ab1fall1energie
ab1fall1er1zeugnis
ab1fall1wirtschaft
ab1fall1wirtschafts1
ab1fall1wirtschafts1amt
ab1fall1wirtschafts1ämter
ab1fang1rakete
ab1feuere
ab1feuern
ab1feuerung
ab1feuerungs1
ab1filtrieren
ab1findung
ab1findungs1
ab1findungs1an1ge1bot
ab1findungs1summe
ab1flug1hafen
ab1flug1häfen
ab1frage1möglichkeit
ab1füll1an1lage
ab1füll1filiale
ab1füll1station
ab1füll1stations1
ab1gaben1erhöhung
ab1gaben1erhöhungs1
ab1gaben1senkung
ab1gaben1senkungs1
ab1gangs1alter
ab1gangs1kon1trolle
ab1gas
ab1gas1aus1tritts1kanal
ab1gas1emission
ab1gas1emissions1
ab1gase
ab1gas1skandal
ab1gas1steuer
ab1gas1steuerung
ab1gas1steuerungs1
ab1gas1steuerungs1software
ab1gas1strang
ab1gas1stränge
ab1ge1fasst
ab1ge1hauen
ab1geize
ab1ge1ordnet
ab1geordnete
ab1geordneten1
ab1geordneten1immunität
ab1ge1passt
ab1hang
ab1hänge
ab1hängig
ab1hängigkeits1
ab1hängigkeits1struktur
ab1hängig1sein
ab1hebe
ab1heuere
ab1heuern
ab1heuerung
ab1heuerungs1
ab1hobst
ab1hör
ab1hör1affäre
ab1hör1aktion
ab1höre
ab1hör1ein1richtung
ab1isoliere
ab1isolier1ge1rät
ab1isoliert
ab1isolierung
ab1isolierungs1
ab1isolier1werk1zeug
ab1isolier1zange
ab1lage
ab1lage1möglichkeit
ab1lasse
ab1lauf
ab1lauf1inter1vall
ab1lauf1organisation
ab1lauf1steuerung
ab1lauf1steuerungs1
ab1lenk1element
ab1lenk1spule
ablepharie
ablepsie
ab1lerne
ab1lese
ab1lese1mikroskop
ab1lesend
ab1ließ
ab1lösung
ablösungs1
ablösungs1summe
ab1meiere
ab1meiern
ab1meierung
ab1nahme
ab1nahme1kon1trolle
ab1olitionismus
ab1olitionist
ab1olitionisten
abon1nement
abon1nements1
abonnements1ab1be1stellung
abonnements1an1gebot
abonnements1er1neuerung
ab1oral
ab1ort
ab1ortion
ab1ortiv
ab1ortivum
ab1ort1psychose
ab1ortus
ab1ort1zange
ab1patrouillieren
ab1pflücke
ab1rackere
ab1rechnung
ab1rechnungs1
ab1rechnungs1zeit1raum
ab1riss
ab1rücke
ab1ruf
ab1ruf1auf1trag
ab1ruf1unter1brechung
ab1ruf1zyklen
ab1ruf1zyklus
ab1rüstung
ab1rüstungs1
ab1rüstungs1be1teuerung
ab1rüstungs1kommission
ab1rüstungs1problem
ab1satz
ab1satz1aus1sicht
ab1satz1be1wusst
ab1satz1be1wusste
ab1satz1be1wusster
ab1sätze
ab1satz1ein1bruch
ab1satz1ein1brüche
ab1satz1ein1buße
ab1satz1ein1zug
ab1satz1ein1züge
ab1satz1ende
ab1satz1erfahrung
ab1satz1erwartung
ab1satz1kontrolle
ab1satz1magnet
ab1satz1problem
ab1satz1prognose
ab1satz1voraus1schätzung
ab1satz1voraus1schätzungs1
ab1satz1wirtschaft
ab1sauge
ab1säuge
ab1schalt
ab1schalt1auto1matik
ab1schalte
ab1schaltung
ab1schaltungs1
ab1schied
ab1schieds1
ab1schieds1album
ab1schieds1essen
ab1schieds1parade
ab1schieds1party
ab1schieds1spiel
ab1schieds1stimmung
ab1schieds1szene
ab1schieds1tour
ab1schieds1tournee
ab1schieds1trank
ab1schieds1trunk
ab1schieds1um1armung
ab1schirm
ab1schirme
ab1schirm1effekt
ab1schirm1ein1richtung
ab1schirmung
ab1schirmungs1
ab1schluss
ab1schluss1an1meldung
ab1schluss1diplom
ab1schlüsse
ab1schluss1erklärung
ab1schluss1etappe
ab1schluss1examen
ab1schluss1examina
ab1schluss1springen
ab1schluss1stecker
ab1schluss1tätigkeit
ab1schluss1termin
ab1schluss1zyklen
ab1schluss1zyklus
ab1schmücke
ab1schreibe
ab1schreibung
ab1schreibungs1
ab1schreibungs1angabe
ab1schreibungs1prognose
ab1schrift
ab1schriften1
abs1cisin
abscisin1säure
ab1sende
ab1sender
ab1sender1adresse
ab1sender1information
ab1sende1spediteur
ab1sende1spedition
ab1singe
ab1solut
ab1solut1ein1tragung
ab1sorbiere
ab1sorptio
ab1sorption
ab1sorptions1
ab1sorptio1metrie
ab1sorptions1spektren
ab1sorptions1spektrum
ab1spenstig
ab1spens1tig1mache
ab1sprache
ab1sprache1ge1mäß
ab1sprache1ge1mäße
ab1sprache1ge1mäßer
ab1stand
ab1stands1
ab1stands1echo
ab1stands1plätt1chen
ab1stands1quadrat
ab1stands1quadrat1ge1setz
ab1stands1summe
ab1stands1taste
ab1starb
ab1starben
ab1starbst
ab1starbt
ab1stech
ab1steche
ab1stecher
ab1stech1werk1zeug
ab1steck
ab1stecke
ab1steckung
ab1steckungs1
ab1stell
ab1stelle
ab1stell1an1lage
ab1sterbe
ab1sterben
ab1sterbest
ab1sterbet
ab1sterbt
ab1stieg
ab1stiegs1
ab1stiegs1platz
ab1stiegs1plätze
ab1stimm
ab1stimm1an1zeige
ab1stimm1auto1matik
ab1stimme
ab1stimmung
ab1stimmungs1
ab1stimmungs1an1zeige
ab1stimmungs1er1gebnis
ab1stimmungs1problem
ab1stirbst
ab1stirbt
ab1stoße
ab1stoßung
ab1stoßungs1
ab1stoßungs1effekt
ab1stoßungs1re1aktion
abs1tract
abs1trahiere
abs1trahiert
ex1trahierung
ex1trahierungs1
abs1trahierungs1fähig
abs1trahierungs1fähig1keit
abs1trakt
abs1trakta
abs1trakte
abs1trakter
abs1trakt1heit
abs1traktion
abs1traktions1
abs1traktions1ebene
abs1traktions1fähigkeit
abs1traktions1funktion
abs1traktions1grad
abs1traktions1level
abs1traktions1niveau
abs1traktions1niveaus
abs1traktions1pro1zess
abs1traktions1schritt
abs1traktions1stufe
abs1traktions1theorie
abs1traktions1ver1fahren
abs1traktions1ver1mögen
abs1traktive
abs1traktor
abs1traktum
ab1streif
ab1streife
ab1streif1ring
ab1streifung
ab1streifungs1
abs1trus
abs1trusität
abs1trusitäts1
ab1stürbe
ab1stürben
ab1stürbest
ab1stürbet
ab1stürbst
ab1stürbt
ab1sturz
ab1sturz1angst
ab1sturz1ängste
ab1stürze
ab1sturz1erkrankung
ab1sturz1erlebnis
ab1sturz1opfer
ab1sturz1ort
ab1sturz1ursache
abs1zess
abs1zisin1säure
ab1szisse
ab1szissen1
ab1szissen1achse
ab1szissen1wert
ab1tast
ab1tast1auf1lösung
ab1taste
ab1tast1hebel
ab1tast1im1puls
ab1tast1inter1vall
ab1tast1öffnung
ab1tast1rate
ab1tastung
ab1tastungs1
abtei
abteien
abtei1hof
abtei1höfe
ab1teil
ab1teile
ab1teilung
ab1teilungs1
ab1teilungs1leiter
ab1teilungs1leiter1ebene
ab1trage
ab1träglich
ab1träglichkeit
ab1tragung
ab1tragungs1
ab1trocken1tuch
ab1trocken1tücher
ab1trockne
ab1usiv
ab1usive
ab1usiver
ab1usus
ab1wäg
ab1wäge
ab1wägung
ab1wägungs1
ab1wägungs1problem
ab1wärts
abwärts1kompatibel
abwärts1kompatible
abwärts1kompatibler
abwärts1spirale
abwärts1strudel
ab1wasser
ab1wasser1ab1leitung
ab1wasser1ein1leitung
ab1wasser1ent1sorger
ab1wasser1ent1sorgung
ab1wasser1ent1sorgungs1
ab1wasser1klärung
ab1wasser1klärungs1
ab1wasser1problem
ab1wehr
ab1wehr1aus1richtung
ab1wehre
ab1wehr1ein1richtung
ab1wehr1ein1stellung
ab1wehr1potential
ab1wehr1potenzial
ab1wehr1reaktion
ab1wehr1spezialist
ab1wickel
ab1wickel1ein1richtung
ab1wickle
ab1wicklung
ab1wicklungs1
ab1wurf
ab1wurf1linie
ab1wurf1quote
ab1zieh
ab1ziehe
ab1zieh1latte
ab1zu1ändern
ab1zu1ändernde
ab1zu1ändernder
ab1zu1drücken
ab1zu1feiern
ab1zu1feiernde
ab1zu1gleiten
ab1zu1pflücken
ab1zu1räumen
ab1zu1tauchen
ab1zu1töten
ab1zu1tötende
ab1zweig
abzweige
abzweig1leitung
acar1di1a1cus
account
account1service
acet1al1de1hyd
ace1tat
ace1to1ace1tat
ace1ton
ace1ton1ämie
ace1ty1len
ace1tyl1sa1li1cyl1säure
achs
achs1aggregat
achse
achsen
achsel
achsel1lymph1knoten
achsen1ame1tropie
achsen1ame1tropien
achsen1skelett
achsen1symmetrie
achsen1symmetrisch
achser
achs1parallel
achs1parallelität
achs1schenkel
achs1schenkel1bolzen
achs1schenkel1lenkung
acht
acht1achser
achte
acht1eck
acht1eckige
achter
achter1schiff
achter1steven
acht1semestrig
acht1und1achtzig
acht1und1achtzig1jährig
acht1und1achtzigster
acht1und1dreißig
acht1und1dreißig1jährig
acht1und1dreißigster
acht1und1fünfzig
acht1und1fünfzig1jährig
acht1und1fünfzigster
acht1und1neunzig
acht1und1neunzig1jährig
acht1und1neunzigster
acht1und1sechzig
acht1und1sechziger
acht1und1sechzig1jährig
acht1und1sechzigster
acht1und1siebzig
acht1und1siebzig1jährig
acht1und1siebzigster
acht1und1vierzig
acht1und1vierziger
acht1und1vierziger1format
acht1und1vierzig1flächner
acht1und1vierzig1jährige
acht1und1vierzigste
acht1zylindrig
ächze
aci1di1metrie
acineto1bacter
acker
äcker
acker1dorf
acker1dörfer
ackere
acker1schlepper
acker1schlepper1fabrik
acryl1aldehyd
acryl1amid
acryl1farbe
acryl1glas
acryl1harz
acryl1sauer
acryl1saure
acryl1säure
action
action1thriller
ada1gio
adagios
adams1town
ad1apter
ad1apto
adapto1metrie
adel
adelig
adels1
adels1palast
adels1paläste
adels1patent
adels1prädikat
adels1spross
adels1stiftung
adels1stolz
ader
aderig
äderig
adern1
adern1egel
ad1häsion
ad1häsions1
ad1häsions1ileus
adi1pös
adi1pos1algia
adipos1algie
adipöse
adipositas
adiposo
adiposo1gigantismus
ad1jektiv
adjektiv1endung
adjektiv1endungen
adjektivisch
ad1junktion
adjunktions1
ad1justabel
ad1justable
adler
adler1auge
ad1ministration
ad1ministrations1
ad1ministrations1befehl
ad1ministrations1konto
ad1ministrations1ober1fläche
ad1ministrations1programm
ad1ministrativ
ad1ministrative
ad1ministrator
ad1ministratoren1
ad1ministrator1konto
ad1ministrator1recht
ad1ministriere
ad1ministrierende
ad1ministrierte
adonis
adonis1röschen
ad1option
adoptions1
ad1optiv
adoptiv1bruder
adoptiv1brüder
adoptiv1schwester
adoptiv1sohn
adoptiv1söhne
adre1ma
adre1ma1platte
adre1nal1ek1tomie
adre1nalin1um1kehr
adress1ab1bild
adress1ab1stand
adress1ab1stände
adress1änderung
adress1an1gabe
adress1an1hängung
adres1sant
adres1san1te
adres1san1ten
adres1san1tin
adres1sat
adressaten1
adressaten1be1zug
adressaten1gruppe
adressaten1kreis
adressaten1nummer
adressaten1orientierung
adressatin
adress1auf1bau
adress1auf1lösungs1protokoll
adress1auf1ruf
adress1aus1wahl
adress1be1fehl
adress1be1rechnung
adress1be1reich
adress1bit
adress1buch
adress1bücher
adress1büro
adress1bus
adress1bus1leitung
adress1co8de1format
adress1dateien
adress1daten
adress1daten1bank
adress1daten1ver1arbeitung
adress1de1kodierung
adresse
adressen1änderung
adressen1an1gabe
adressen1an1hänger
adressen1auf1kleber
adressen1aus1tausch
adressen1büro
adressen1de1finition
adressen1de1kodierer
adressen1ein1gabe
adressen1ende
adressen1er1zeugung
adressen1feld
adressen1generierung
adressen1kapazität
adressen1karte
adressen1kartei
adressen1kata1log
adressen1kon1trolle
adressen1leer1stelle
adressen1liste
adressen1modi1fikation
adressen1nach1weis
adressen1nummer
adressen1quelle
adressen1register
adressen1schreibung
adressen1spur
adressen1system
adressen1tausch
adressen1teil
